ro-RO: Saturație culoare: Ridicată; Redusă; Normală; Altele
cs: Saturace barev: Vysoký; Nízký; Normální; Jiné
de: Farbsättigung: Hoch; Niedrig; Normal; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 色彩飽和度: 高; 低; 中性; 其他
hr-HR: Zasićenost boja: Visoka; Niska; Normalna; Ostalo
tr: Renk Doygunluğu: Yüksek; Düşük; Normal; Diğer
lt-LT: Spalvų sodrumas: Didelė; Maža; Normali; Kita
sv: Färgmättnad: Hög; Låg; Normalt; Övrigt
nb: Fargemetning: Høy; Lav; Normal; Annet
sk-SK: Sýtosť farieb: Vysoký; Nízky; Normálny; Iné
hu: Színtelítettség: Magas; Alacsony; Normál; Egyéb
bg-BG: Наситеност на цвета: Висока; Ниска; Нормална; Други
fi: Värikylläisyys: Korkea; Matala; Normaali; Muu
ru: Насыщенность цвета: Высокий; Низкий; Нормальный; Другое
it: Saturazione del colore: Alto; Basso; Normale; Altro
nl: Kleurverzadiging: Hoog; Laag; Normaal; Andere
th: ความอิ่มตัวของสี: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; ผิวปกติ; อื่นๆ
es: Saturación del color: Alto; Bajo; Normal; Otros
zh-CN: 色彩饱和度: 高; 低; 普通; 其他
vi: Độ bão hoà màu: Cao; Trễ; Da thường; Khác
pt-BR: Saturação de cor: Alta; Baixa; Normal; Outro
ko: 채도: 높음; 낮음; 일반; 기타
pl: Nasycenie: Wysoki; Niski; Normalny; Inne
pt-PT: Saturação de cor: Alto; Baixo; Normal; Outro
sl-SI: Barvna nasičenost: Visoka; Nizka; Normalna; Drugo
en: Color saturation: High; Low; Normal; Other
el: Κορεσμός χρώματος: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Κανονικός; Άλλο
fr: Saturation des couleurs: Haute; Basse; Normale; Autre
ja: 彩度: 高; 低; 普通; その他
da: Farvemætning: Høj; Lav; Normalt; Andet